Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.092

Unsolicited information about learning programs—Prohibition on providing to persons who file a declaration of intent to cause a child to receive home-based instruction—Exceptions.

School districts are prohibited from advertising, marketing, and otherwise providing unsolicited information about learning programs offered by the school district, including but not limited to digital learning programs, part-time enrollment opportunities, and other alternative learning programs, to students and their parents who have filed a declaration of intent to cause a child to receive home-based instruction under RCW 28A.200.010. School districts may respond to requests for information that are initiated by a parent. This section does not apply to general mailings or newsletters sent by the school district to all households in the district.

[ 2009 c 190 s 1.]